Florida, session 2026, HB349.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (18) and (19) of section 395.1055,
Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
395.1055 Rules and enforcement.—
(18)(a) In establishing rules for adult cardiovascular
services, The agency shall grant licensure include provisions
that allow for:
(a) the establishment of two hospital program licensure
levels, a Level I program that authorizes the performance of
adult percutaneous cardiac intervention without onsite cardiac
surgery, including rotational or other atherectomy devices,
electrophysiology, and treatment of chronic total occlusions,
and a Level II program that authorizes the performance of
percutaneous cardiac intervention with onsite cardiac surgery.
(b)1. For A hospital seeking licensure as a Level I
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb349-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 349 2026
program must:, demonstration that, for the most recent 12-month
period as reported to the agency, the hospital has provided a
minimum of 300 adult inpatient and outpatient diagnostic cardiac
catheterizations or, for the most recent 12-month period, has
discharged or transferred at least 300 patients with the
principal diagnosis of ischemic heart disease and that it has
1. Have a formalized, written transfer agreement with a
hospital that has a Level II program, including written
transport protocols to ensure safe and efficient transfer of a
patient within 60 minutes.
2.a. A hospital located more than 100 road miles from the
closest Level II adult cardiovascular services program is not
required to meet the diagnostic cardiac catheterization volume
and ischemic heart disease diagnosis volume requirements in
subparagraph 1. if the hospital demonstrates that it has, for
the most recent 12-month period as reported to the agency,
provided a minimum of 100 adult inpatient and outpatient
diagnostic cardiac catheterizations or that, for the most recent
12-month period, it has discharged or transferred at least 300
patients with the principal diagnosis of ischemic heart disease.
b. For a hospital located more than 100 road miles from
the closest Level II adult cardiovascular services program, have
does not need to meet the 60-minute transfer time protocol
requirement in subparagraph 1. if the hospital demonstrates that
it has a formalized, written transfer agreement with a hospital
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb349-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 349 2026
that has a Level II program. The agreement must include written
transport protocols to ensure the safe and efficient transfer of
a patient, taking into consideration the patient's clinical and
physical characteristics, road and weather conditions, and
viability of ground and air ambulance service to transfer the
patient.
3. At a minimum, the rules for adult cardiovascular
services must require nursing and technical staff to have
demonstrated experience in handling acutely ill patients
requiring intervention, based on the staff member's previous
experience in dedicated cardiac interventional laboratories or
surgical centers. If a staff member's previous experience is in
a dedicated cardiac interventional laboratory at a hospital that
does not have an approved adult open heart surgery program, the
staff member's previous experience qualifies only if, at the
time the staff member acquired his or her experience, the
dedicated cardiac interventional laboratory:
a. Had an annual volume of 500 or more percutaneous
cardiac intervention procedures.
b. Achieved a demonstrated success rate of 95 percent or
greater for percutaneous cardiac intervention procedures.
c. Experienced a complication rate of less than 5 percent
for percutaneous cardiac intervention procedures.
d. Performed diverse cardiac procedures, including, but
not limited to, balloon angioplasty and stenting, rotational
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb349-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 349 2026
atherectomy, cutting balloon atheroma remodeling, and procedures
relating to left ventricular support capability.
(c) For A hospital seeking licensure as a Level II program
must demonstrate, demonstration that, for the most recent 12-
month period as reported to the agency, the hospital has
performed a minimum of 1,100 adult inpatient and outpatient
cardiac catheterizations, of which at least 400 must be
therapeutic catheterizations, or, for the most recent 12-month
period, has discharged at least 800 patients with the principal
diagnosis of ischemic heart disease.
(d) As a condition of licensure as a Level I or Level II
program, a hospital must demonstrate all of the following:
1. Compliance with the most recent guidelines of the
American College of Cardiology, and the American Heart
Association, the Society for Cardiovascular Angiography and
Interventions, and, for hospitals providing electrophysiology
services, the Heart Rhythm Society guidelines for staffing,
physician training and experience, operating procedures,
equipment, physical plant, and patient selection criteria, to
ensure patient quality and safety.
2.(e) The establishment of appropriate hours of operation
and protocols to ensure availability and timely referral in the
event of emergencies.
3.(f) The demonstration of A plan to provide services to
100 Medicaid and charity care patients.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb349-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 349 2026
101 4.(g) For a hospital licensed as a for adult diagnostic
102 cardiac catheterization that provides Level I or Level II
103 program for adult cardiovascular services, demonstration that
104 the hospital is participating in the American College of
105 Cardiology's National Cardiovascular Data Registry or the
106 American Heart Association's Get with the Guidelines–Coronary
107 Artery Disease registry and documentation of an ongoing quality
108 improvement plan ensuring that the licensed cardiac program
109 meets or exceeds national quality and outcome benchmarks
110 reported by the registry in which the hospital participates. A
111 hospital licensed for Level II adult cardiovascular services
112 must also participate in the clinical outcome reporting systems
113 operated by the Society for Thoracic Surgeons.
114 (19) The agency may adopt rules to administer the
115 requirements of part II of chapter 408 and shall update such
116 rules as new applicable industry standards and guidelines are
117 published.
118 Section 2. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb349-00